Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-239
Hospitals; jails; other institutions; erection; regulation.

A city of the first class may erect, establish, and regulate hospitals, multiunit housing, houses of correction, jails, station houses, and other necessary buildings and provide for the support and government of such buildings and facilities.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XLV, p. 257;

R.S.1913, § 4855;

C.S.1922, § 4023;

C.S.1929, § 16-240;

R.S.1943, § 16-239;

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 13;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 39.